Maine, session 132, LD1352.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6702, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 107, §1, is amended to
read:
7. Apprentice license. The department may adopt rules to establish an apprentice
program for entry into the scallop fishery that includes an apprentice license for a resident
who is 18 years of age or older to engage in dragging for scallops under the supervision of
a person licensed under this section. An apprentice program under this subsection may not
be conducted through a lottery. The fee for an apprentice scallop dragging license is $250.
The commissioner shall deposit license fees collected in this subsection into the Scallop
Research Fund under section 6729‑A. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6706, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 107, §2, is further
amended to read:
3. Scallop license limited entry system. Notwithstanding subsection 2, the
commissioner shall establish by rule a limited entry system under which a person who did
not hold a hand fishing scallop license or a scallop dragging license in the previous calendar
year may become eligible to obtain that license. A new entrant may be eligible for a hand
fishing scallop license or a scallop dragging license only upon the termination of an existing
hand fishing scallop license or a scallop dragging license. The rules for a limited entry
system must include provisions for the method and administration of the system. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6706, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 27, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Department of Marine Resources to adopt rules regarding limited
and rotational access to scallop harvesting areas. By January 1, 2026, the
Department of Marine Resources shall adopt rules that allow all holders of hand fishing
scallop licenses and scallop dragging licenses equal access to limited access scallop fishing
areas during the same period and not on a rotational basis. Rules adopted pursuant to this
section are routine technical rules under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. Department of Marine Resources to amend rules to replace scallop
apprentice program conducted through lottery. By October 1, 2026, the
Department of Marine Resources shall adopt rules replacing the apprentice program for
entry into the scallop fishery, which includes an apprentice license, conducted through a
lottery with an apprentice program for entry into the scallop fishery, which includes an
apprentice license, not conducted through a lottery. Rules adopted pursuant to this section
are routine technical rules under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 6. Effective date. Those sections of this Act that amend the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 12, section 6702, subsection 7 and that repeal Title 12, section 6706,
subsection 5 take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR0325(01)